South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S766.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 44-63-110 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 44-63-110. (A) For making, furnishing, or certifying any card, certificate, or certified copy of the record, for filing a record amendment according to the provisions of Section 44-63-60, 44-63-80, 44-63-90, or 44-63-100, or for searching the record, when no card, certificate, or certified copy is made, a fee in an amount as determined by the Board of the Department of Public Health and Environmental Control must be paid by the applicant, except that the Department of Social Services or its designee is not required to pay a fee when the information is needed for the purpose of establishing paternity or establishing, modifying, or enforcing a child support obligation. The amount of the fee established by the boarddepartment may not exceed the cost of the services performed and to the extent possible must be charged on a uniform basis throughout the State. When verification of the facts contained in these records is needed for Veterans Administration purposes in connection with a claim, it must be furnished without charge to the Veterans' Affairs Department of the Governor's Office or to a county veterans affairs officer upon request and upon the furnishing of satisfactory evidence that the request is for the purpose authorized in this chapter. (B)(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (A), fees for applicant requests pursuant to this section must be waived for all requests made by a homeless person whose status is verified as provided in item (2) and children who have aged out of the foster care system. A homeless person shall be provided no more than four birth records annually pursuant to this section. (2) An individual's status as a homeless person may be verified by a human services agency, legal services agency, or other similar agency that has knowledge of the individual's housing status including, but not limited to: (a) a homeless service agency receiving federal, state, county, or municipal funding to provide those services or otherwise sanctioned by a local continuum of care; (b) an attorney licensed to practice in the State; (c) a public school homeless liaison or school social worker; or (d) a human service provider funded by the State to serve homeless or runaway youth, individuals with mental illness, or individuals with addictions. (3) The department shall promulgate regulations to establish standards and procedures consistent with this section for waiver of applicable fees. SECTION 2.  Section 56-1-3350 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (G)(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (C), fees for applicant requests pursuant to this section must be waived for all requests made by a homeless person whose status is verified as provided in item (2) and children who have aged out of the foster care system. (2) An individual's status as a homeless person may be verified by a human services agency, legal services agency, or other similar agency that has knowledge of the individual's housing status including, but not limited to: (a) a homeless service agency receiving federal, state, county, or municipal funding to provide those services or otherwise sanctioned by a local continuum of care; (b) an attorney licensed to practice in the State; (c) a public school homeless liaison or school social worker; or (d) a human service provider funded by the State to serve homeless or runaway youth, individuals with mental illness, or individuals with addictions. (3) The department shall promulgate regulations to establish standards and procedures consistent with this section for waiver of applicable fees. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----